Utah statutes.
9-7-509.   Entities may cooperate, merge, or consolidate in providing library services.

Boards of directors of city libraries, boards of directors of county libraries, boards of education, governing boards of other educational institutions, library agencies, and local political subdivisions may cooperate in providing library services or merge or consolidate under an interlocal agreement approved and implemented in accordance with Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act.

